Illinois, session 104th, HB2499.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Government Debt Reform Act is amended 5by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 350/15)  (from Ch. 17, par. 6915)7    Sec. 15. Double-barrelled bonds. Whenever revenue bonds 8have been authorized to be issued pursuant to applicable law 9or whenever there exists for a governmental unit a revenue 10source, the procedures set forth in this Section may be used by 11a governing body. General obligation bonds may be issued in 12lieu of such revenue bonds as authorized, and general 13obligation bonds may be issued payable from any revenue 14source. Such general obligation bonds may be referred to as 15"alternate bonds". Alternate bonds may be issued without any 16referendum or backdoor referendum except as provided in this 17Section, upon the terms provided in Section 10 of this Act 18without reference to other provisions of law, but only upon 19the conditions provided in this Section. Alternate bonds shall 20not be regarded as or included in any computation of 21indebtedness for the purpose of any statutory provision or 22limitation except as expressly provided in this Section.23    Such conditions are:  HB2499- 2 -LRB104 04608 HLH 14635 b1    (a) Alternate bonds shall be issued for a lawful corporate 2purpose. If issued in lieu of revenue bonds, alternate bonds 3shall be issued for the purposes for which such revenue bonds 4shall have been authorized. If issued payable from a revenue 5source in the manner hereinafter provided, which revenue 6source is limited in its purposes or applications, then the 7alternate bonds shall be issued only for such limited purposes 8or applications. Alternate bonds may be issued payable from 9either enterprise revenues or revenue sources, or both. 10Alternate bonds issued on or after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly may not be 12secured by the proceeds of general obligation bonds that were 13issued without referendum approval. 14    (b) Alternate bonds shall be subject to backdoor 15referendum. The provisions of Section 5 of this Act shall 16apply to such backdoor referendum, together with the 17provisions hereof. The authorizing ordinance shall be 18published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 19governmental unit. Along with or as part of the authorizing 20ordinance, there shall be published a notice of (1) the 21specific number of voters required to sign a petition 22requesting that the issuance of the alternate bonds be 23submitted to referendum, (2) the time when such petition must 24be filed, (3) the date of the prospective referendum, and (4), 25with respect to authorizing ordinances adopted on or after 26January 1, 1991, a statement that identifies any revenue   HB2499- 3 -LRB104 04608 HLH 14635 b1source that will be used to pay debt service on the alternate 2bonds. The clerk or secretary of the governmental unit shall 3make a petition form available to anyone requesting one. 4    Except as provided in the following paragraph, if no 5petition is filed with the clerk or secretary within 30 days of 6publication of the authorizing ordinance and notice, the 7alternate bonds shall be authorized to be issued. But if 8within this 30 days period, a petition is filed with such clerk 9or secretary signed by electors numbering the greater of (i) 107.5% of the registered voters in the governmental unit or (ii) 11200 of those registered voters or 15% of those registered 12voters, whichever is less, asking that the issuance of such 13alternate bonds be submitted to referendum, the clerk or 14secretary shall certify such question for submission at an 15election held in accordance with the general election law. 16    Notwithstanding the previous paragraph, in governmental 17units with fewer than 500,000 inhabitants that propose to 18issue alternate bonds payable solely from enterprise revenues 19as defined under Section 3 of this Act, except for such 20alternate bonds that finance or refinance projects concerning 21public utilities, public streets and roads or public safety 22facilities, and related infrastructure and equipment, if no 23petition is filed with the clerk or secretary within 45 days of 24publication of the authorizing ordinance and notice, the 25alternate bonds shall be authorized to be issued. But if, 26within this 45-day period, a petition is filed with such clerk   HB2499- 4 -LRB104 04608 HLH 14635 b1or secretary signed by the necessary number of electors, 2asking that the issuance of such alternate bonds be submitted 3to referendum, the clerk or secretary shall certify such 4question for submission at an election held in accordance with 5the general election law. For purposes of this paragraph, the 6necessary number of electors for a governmental unit with more 7than 4,000 registered voters is the lesser of (i) 5% of the 8registered voters or (ii) 5,000 registered voters; and the 9necessary number of electors for a governmental unit with 104,000 or fewer registered voters is the lesser of (i) 15% of 11the registered voters or (ii) 200 registered voters. 12    The question on the ballot shall include a statement of 13any revenue source that will be used to pay debt service on the 14alternate bonds. The alternate bonds shall be authorized to be 15issued if a majority of the votes cast on the question at such 16election are in favor thereof provided that notice of the bond 17referendum, if held before July 1, 1999, has been given in 18accordance with the provisions of Section 12-5 of the Election 19Code in effect at the time of the bond referendum, at least 10 20and not more than 45 days before the date of the election, 21notwithstanding the time for publication otherwise imposed by 22Section 12-5. Notices required in connection with the 23submission of public questions on or after July 1, 1999 shall 24be as set forth in Section 12-5 of the Election Code. Backdoor 25referendum proceedings for bonds and alternate bonds to be 26issued in lieu of such bonds may be conducted at the same time.   HB2499- 5 -LRB104 04608 HLH 14635 b1    (c) To the extent payable from enterprise revenues, such 2revenues shall have been determined by the governing body to 3be sufficient to provide for or pay in each year to final 4maturity of such alternate bonds all of the following: (1) 5costs of operation and maintenance of the utility or 6enterprise, but not including depreciation, (2) debt service 7on all outstanding revenue bonds payable from such enterprise 8revenues, (3) all amounts required to meet any fund or account 9requirements with respect to such outstanding revenue bonds, 10(4) other contractual or tort liability obligations, if any, 11payable from such enterprise revenues, and (5) in each year, 12an amount not less than 1.25 times debt service of all (i) 13alternate bonds payable from such enterprise revenues 14previously issued and outstanding and (ii) alternate bonds 15proposed to be issued. To the extent payable from one or more 16revenue sources, such sources shall have been determined by 17the governing body to provide in each year, an amount not less 18than 1.25 times debt service of all alternate bonds payable 19from such revenue sources previously issued and outstanding 20and alternate bonds proposed to be issued. The 1.25 figure in 21the preceding sentence shall be reduced to 1.10 if the revenue 22source is a governmental revenue source. The conditions 23enumerated in this subsection (c) need not be met for that 24amount of debt service provided for by the setting aside of 25proceeds of bonds or other moneys at the time of the delivery 26of such bonds.   HB2499- 6 -LRB104 04608 HLH 14635 b1    (c-1) In the case of alternate bonds issued as variable 2rate bonds (including refunding bonds), debt service shall be 3projected based on the rate for the most recent date shown in 4the 20 G.O. Bond Index of average municipal bond yields as 5published in the most recent edition of The Bond Buyer 6published in New York, New York (or any successor publication 7or index, or if such publication or index is no longer 8published, then any index of long-term municipal tax-exempt 9bond yields selected by the governmental unit), as of the date 10of determination referred to in subsection (c) of this 11Section. Any interest or fees that may be payable to the 12provider of a letter of credit, line of credit, surety bond, 13bond insurance, or other credit enhancement relating to such 14alternate bonds and any fees that may be payable to any 15remarketing agent need not be taken into account for purposes 16of such projection. If the governmental unit enters into an 17agreement in connection with such alternate bonds at the time 18of issuance thereof pursuant to which the governmental unit 19agrees for a specified period of time to pay an amount 20calculated at an agreed-upon rate or index based on a notional 21amount and the other party agrees to pay the governmental unit 22an amount calculated at an agreed-upon rate or index based on 23such notional amount, interest shall be projected for such 24specified period of time on the basis of the agreed-upon rate 25payable by the governmental unit.26    (d) The determination of the sufficiency of enterprise   HB2499- 7 -LRB104 04608 HLH 14635 b1revenues or a revenue source, as applicable, shall be 2supported by reference to the most recent audit of the 3governmental unit, which shall be for a fiscal year ending not 4earlier than 18 months previous to the time of issuance of the 5alternate bonds. If such audit does not adequately show such 6enterprise revenues or revenue source, as applicable, or if 7such enterprise revenues or revenue source, as applicable, are 8shown to be insufficient, then the determination of 9sufficiency shall be supported by the report of an independent 10accountant or feasibility analyst, the latter having a 11national reputation for expertise in such matters, who is not 12otherwise involved in the project being financed or refinanced 13with the proceeds of the alternate bonds, demonstrating the 14sufficiency of such revenues and explaining, if appropriate, 15by what means the revenues will be greater than as shown in the 16audit. Whenever such sufficiency is demonstrated by reference 17to a schedule of higher rates or charges for enterprise 18revenues or a higher tax imposition for a revenue source, such 19higher rates, charges or taxes shall have been properly 20imposed by an ordinance adopted prior to the time of delivery 21of alternate bonds. The reference to and acceptance of an 22audit or report, as the case may be, and the determination of 23the governing body as to sufficiency of enterprise revenues or 24a revenue source shall be conclusive evidence that the 25conditions of this Section have been met and that the 26alternate bonds are valid.  HB2499- 8 -LRB104 04608 HLH 14635 b1    (e) The enterprise revenues or revenue source, as 2applicable, shall be in fact pledged to the payment of the 3alternate bonds; and the governing body shall covenant, to the 4extent it is empowered to do so, to provide for, collect and 5apply such enterprise revenues or revenue source, as 6applicable, to the payment of the alternate bonds and the 7provision of not less than an additional .25 (or .10 for 8governmental revenue sources) times debt service. The pledge 9and establishment of rates or charges for enterprise revenues, 10or the imposition of taxes in a given rate or amount, as 11provided in this Section for alternate bonds, shall constitute 12a continuing obligation of the governmental unit with respect 13to such establishment or imposition and a continuing 14appropriation of the amounts received. All covenants relating 15to alternate bonds and the conditions and obligations imposed 16by this Section are enforceable by any bondholder of alternate 17bonds affected, any taxpayer of the governmental unit, and the 18People of the State of Illinois acting through the Attorney 19General or any designee, and in the event that any such action 20results in an order finding that the governmental unit has not 21properly set rates or charges or imposed taxes to the extent it 22is empowered to do so or collected and applied enterprise 23revenues or any revenue source, as applicable, as required by 24this Act, the plaintiff in any such action shall be awarded 25reasonable attorney's fees. The intent is that such enterprise 26revenues or revenue source, as applicable, shall be sufficient   HB2499- 9 -LRB104 04608 HLH 14635 b1and shall be applied to the payment of debt service on such 2alternate bonds so that taxes need not be levied, or if levied 3need not be extended, for such payment. Nothing in this 4Section shall inhibit or restrict the authority of a governing 5body to determine the lien priority of any bonds, including 6alternate bonds, which may be issued with respect to any 7enterprise revenues or revenue source.8    In the event that alternate bonds shall have been issued 9and taxes, other than a designated revenue source, shall have 10been extended pursuant to the general obligation, full faith 11and credit promise supporting such alternate bonds, then the 12amount of such alternate bonds then outstanding shall be 13included in the computation of indebtedness of the 14governmental unit for purposes of all statutory provisions or 15limitations until such time as an audit of the governmental 16unit shall show that the alternate bonds have been paid from 17the enterprise revenues or revenue source, as applicable, 18pledged thereto for a complete fiscal year.19    Alternate bonds may be issued to refund or advance refund 20alternate bonds without meeting any of the conditions set 21forth in this Section, except that the term of the refunding 22bonds shall not be longer than the term of the refunded bonds 23and that the debt service payable in any year on the refunding 24bonds shall not exceed the debt service payable in such year on 25the refunded bonds.26    Once issued, alternate bonds shall be and forever remain   HB2499- 10 -LRB104 04608 HLH 14635 b1until paid or defeased the general obligation of the 2governmental unit, for the payment of which its full faith and 3credit are pledged, and shall be payable from the levy of taxes 4as is provided in this Act for general obligation bonds.5    The changes made by this amendatory Act of 1990 do not 6affect the validity of bonds authorized before September 1, 71990.8(Source: P.A. 97-542, eff. 8-23-11; 98-203, eff. 1-1-14.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.